Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 8.1 Shellfish Grounds

20-8.1-1.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply to this chapter:

“Approved” means approved by the director;

“Conditionally approved water” means and includes any shellfish grounds underlying waters examined and found fit for the taking of shellfish for human consumption on an intermittent basis, declared by the director as conditionally approved waters pursuant to §§

20-8.1-3

and

20-8.1-4

;

“Department” means the state department of environmental management;

“Director” means the director of the state department of environmental management or his or her duly appointed agents;

“Person” means any individual, firm, copartnership, association, or private or municipal corporation;

“Polluted area” means and includes any shellfish grounds underlying waters examined and found to be unfit for the taking of shellfish for human consumption declared by the director as polluted areas pursuant to §§

20-8.1-3

and

20-8.1-4

;

For the purposes of any criminal or civil proceeding instituted under this chapter, a declaration by the director shall be prima facie evidence of a polluted area;

“Shellfish” means and includes oysters, mussels, and all varieties of clams;

“Shellfish grounds” means and includes all land underlying waters within the rise and fall of the tide and the marine limits of the jurisdiction of the state; and

“Taking” means and includes the gathering, digging, raking, tonging, or dredging of shellfish.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 5; P.L. 1994, ch. 59, § 1.

20-8.1-2.
Regulations.

The director shall, with the approval of the environmental standards board established under §

42-17.3-1

[repealed], adopt any regulations regarding shellfish grounds that he or she deems necessary with reference to the growing and taking of shellfish.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1.

20-8.1-2.1.
Possession and handling of shellfish — Regulations.

The director is empowered to promulgate, for the purposes of protecting the public health after consultation with the department of health, regulations governing the possession and handling of shellfish by commercial harvesters licensed under this title. The penalties prescribed in §

20-8.1-11

shall not apply to this section. Any violation of the rules and regulations adopted under this section shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in §

20-1-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 326, § 1.

20-8.1-3.
Investigation of shellfish grounds — Notice of polluted areas.

The director shall investigate the sanitary condition of the waters overlying shellfish grounds. Those waters that are found to be in an unsatisfactory sanitary condition for the taking of shellfish for human consumption shall be declared to be polluted areas. The director shall give annual notice as to those areas of the waters of the state that he or she has declared to be polluted by advertising this action in at least one public newspaper published in the city of Providence. The director shall provide notice with each shellfish license issued or reissued after December 31, 1994, that it is the obligation of each licensee to inquire by calling a dedicated telephone line, or dedicated teletext phone for persons who are deaf, hard of hearing, or speech-impaired (TTY) line maintained by the department of environmental management prior to taking any shellfish in the waters of the state that are conditionally approved waters. The director shall arrange for notice to be provided on the telephone and TTY telephone lines as to those conditionally approved waters of the state that the director declares to be polluted from which no shellfish may be taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 42; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 42; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 28.

20-8.1-4.
Factors considered in determining polluted areas.

In making a determination that an area is polluted, the director shall ensure consistency with the requirements of the National Shellfish Sanitation Program. When necessary, for consistency with National Shellfish Sanitation Program requirements, the director may declare an area to be polluted in the absence of monitoring data if the director has evidence that the area may become polluted. A review of the status of all the areas in the state shall be made by the director on at least an annual basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 250, § 1.

20-8.1-5.
Taking or selling shellfish from polluted areas.

No person shall take shellfish from the waters of polluted areas, or knowingly sell shellfish taken from the waters of polluted areas, except pursuant to a transplant program specifically authorized by and conducted under the direct supervision of the director. In granting permission, the department of environmental management shall first obtain the written approval of the director of the department of health as to the suitability and safety for the purposes intended. The possession by any person of shellfish while in a vessel upon the waters of polluted areas between the hours of two (2) hours after sunset and sunrise shall be prima facie evidence that those shellfish were taken by that person in violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 173, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 59, § 1.

20-8.1-6.
Use of dredges, tongs, and rakes in polluted areas.

No person shall work a dredge, pair of tongs, rake or rakes, or any other implement commonly employed in taking shellfish, except an implement commonly employed for the taking of scallops, in a polluted area, nor shall any person, while upon or sailing over any polluted area, cast, haul, or have overboard any dredge, pair of tongs, rake or rakes, or any other implement commonly employed in taking shellfish except an implement commonly employed for the taking of scallops.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1.

20-8.1-7.
Taking, sale of, or possession of non-complying shellfish prohibited — Confiscation — Search warrants.

No person shall take, sell, or possess within this state any shellfish that have not been taken in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter. Any shellfish that the director has reasonable cause to believe have been taken from polluted areas or that have not been taken in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter, shall be confiscated. Search warrants may be issued by any district court upon the complaint of the director, or the director’s duly authorized agents, relating to violations of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 173, § 4.

20-8.1-8.
Enforcement — Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the director to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter and to prosecute all persons guilty of violations of these regulations. In all prosecutions, the director shall not be required to enter into any recognizance nor to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1.

20-8.1-9.
Inspection of boats, vessels, and vehicles.

The director shall make regular inspections of the boats, vessels, and vehicles used, or suggested of being used, in the taking possession, handling, or transporting of shellfish, and no person shall interfere with, or obstruct, the entrance of the director to any boat, vessel, or vehicle, for the purpose of making inspections, and no person shall obstruct the conduct of any inspection; provided, however, that inspections as to the taking possession and handling of shellfish shall be made only by the director or employees of the state department of environmental management. Nothing in this section shall negate or otherwise affect the authority of the department of health as granted in title 21.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 326, § 2.

20-8.1-10.
Powers of enforcement.

Conservation officers of the department may arrest any person found violating any of the provisions of this chapter, and may seize all shellfish and any boat or vessel, or outboard motor, or dredge, tongs, rakes, or other implements, commonly employed in the taking of shellfish, in possession of any person violating the provisions of this chapter, and may make complaints for all those violations, and in any complaint they shall not be required at the time of the complaint or thereafter to enter into recognizance or in any way to become liable for the costs that may accrue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1.

20-8.1-11.
Penalties for violations.

Persons convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter, shall be punished by a term of imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both, for a first offense; and by a term of imprisonment not exceeding four (4) years or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both, for a subsequent offense. Any boat or vessel, or outboard motor, or dredge, tongs, rakes, or other implements, commonly employed in the taking of shellfish, seized from any person as used in violation of §§

20-8.1-5

and/or

20-8.1-6

, shall, upon conviction of that person, be forfeited to the state. That forfeiture shall follow the course provided in chapter 21 of title 12 as amended and §

20-1-8.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 5; P.L. 1983, ch. 173, § 4.

20-8.1-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 4, effective January 1, 1982.